Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3503
Definitions; sections found.

For the purposes of sections 29-209, 29-210, 29-3501 to 29-3528, and 81-1423, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 29-3504 to 29-3514 shall be used.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 3.